Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 45
FAIR CAMPAIGN PRACTICES ACT

1-45-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Fair Campaign Practices Act".

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-45-101 as it existed prior to 1996.

1-45-102. Legislative declaration.

The people of the state of Colorado hereby find and declare that large campaign contributions to political candidates allow wealthy contributors and special interest groups to exercise a disproportionate level of influence over the political process; that large campaign contributions create the potential for corruption and the appearance of corruption; that the rising costs of campaigning for political office prevent qualified citizens from running for political office; and that the interests of the public are best served by limiting campaign contributions, establishing campaign spending limits, full and timely disclosure of campaign contributions, and strong enforcement of campaign laws.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

Initiated 2012, (Amendment 65):

Entire section amended, L. 2013, p. 3301, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 1, 2013.

1-45-103. Definitions - repeal.

As used in this article 45, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Appropriate officer" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (1) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

(1.3) "Ballot issue" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 1-1-104 (2.3); except that, for purposes of section 1-45-117, "ballot issue" shall mean both a ballot issue as defined in this subsection (1.3) and a ballot question.

(1.5) "Ballot question" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 1-1-104 (2.7).

"Candidate" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (2) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Candidate committee" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (3) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Candidate committee account" shall mean the account established by a candidate committee with a financial institution pursuant to section 3 (9) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Conduit" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (4) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Contribution" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (5) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Contribution" includes, with regard to a contribution for which the contributor receives compensation or consideration of less than equivalent value to such contribution, including, but not limited to, items of perishable or nonpermanent value, goods, supplies, services, or participation in a campaign-related event, an amount equal to the value in excess of such compensation or consideration as determined by the candidate committee.

"Contribution" also includes:

Any payment, loan, pledge, gift, advance of money, or guarantee of a loan made to any political organization;

Any payment made to a third party on behalf of and with the knowledge of the political organization; or

The fair market value of any gift or loan of property made to any political organization.

"Contribution" does not include the payment of legal fees to advise a candidate on compliance with campaign laws or regulations or to represent a candidate or candidate committee in any action in which the candidate or committee has been named as a defendant. Such legal services are not undertaken "for the benefit of any candidate committee" or "for the purpose of promoting the candidate's nomination, retention, recall, or election" as those phrases are used in section 2 (5)(a)(II) and (5)(a)(IV) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Contribution" does not include an intervention by the secretary of state, as authorized by section 1-45-111.5 (1.5)(g), in any action brought to enforce the provisions of article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article 45.

"Corporation" means a domestic corporation incorporated under and subject to the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of title 7, C.R.S., a domestic nonprofit corporation incorporated under and subject to the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., or any corporation incorporated under and subject to the laws of another state. For purposes of this article, "domestic corporation" shall mean a for-profit or nonprofit corporation incorporated under and subject to the laws of this state, and "nondomestic corporation" shall mean a corporation incorporated under and subject to the laws of another state or foreign country. For purposes of this article, "corporation" includes the parent of a subsidiary corporation or any subsidiaries of the parent, as applicable.

(7.2) "Direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditure" means direct spending in support of or opposition to any single ballot issue or ballot question by a person who does not otherwise meet the requirements of an issue committee. Contributions to an issue committee are not direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditures.

(7.3) (a) "Donation" means:

The payment, loan, pledge, gift, or advance of money, or the guarantee of a loan, made to any person for the purpose of making an independent expenditure;

Any payment made to a third party that relates to, and is made for the benefit of, any person that makes an independent expenditure;

The fair market value of any gift or loan of property that is given to any person for the purpose of making an independent expenditure; or

Anything of value given, directly or indirectly, to any person for the purpose of making an independent expenditure.

"Donation" shall not include a transfer by a membership organization of a portion of a member's dues for an independent expenditure sponsored by such membership organization.

(7.5) "Earmark" means a designation, instruction, or encumbrance that directs the transmission and use by the recipient of all or part of a donation to a third party for the purpose of making:

Independent expenditures greater than one thousand dollars to support or oppose a specified candidate;

Electioneering communications greater than one thousand dollars; or

Contributions or expenditures greater than one thousand dollars to support or oppose a specified ballot issue or ballot question.

"Election cycle" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (6) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Electioneering communication" has the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (7) of article XXVIII of the state constitution. For purposes of the disclosure required by section 1-45-108, "electioneering communication" also includes any communication that satisfies all other requirements set forth in said section 2 (7) of article XXVIII but that is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered, or distributed between the primary election and the general election.

"Expenditure" has the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (8) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Expenditure" does not include legal services paid to defend a candidate or candidate committee against any action brought to enforce the provisions of article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article 45.

(10.5) "Foreign corporation" means:

A parent corporation or the subsidiary of a parent corporation formed under the laws of a foreign country that is functionally equivalent to a domestic corporation;

A parent corporation or the subsidiary of a parent corporation in which one or more foreign persons hold a combined ownership interest that exceeds fifty percent;

A parent corporation or the subsidiary of a parent corporation in which one or more foreign persons hold a majority of the positions on the corporation's board of directors; or

A parent corporation or the subsidiary of a parent corporation whose United States-based operations, or whose decision-making with respect to political activities, falls under the direction or control of a foreign entity, including the government of a foreign country.

"Independent expenditure" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (9) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

(11.5) "Independent expenditure committee" means one or more persons that make an independent expenditure in an aggregate amount in excess of one thousand dollars or that collect in excess of one thousand dollars from one or more persons for the purpose of making an independent expenditure.

"Issue committee" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (10) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

For purposes of section 2 (10)(a)(I) of article XXVIII of the state constitution, "major purpose" means support of or opposition to a ballot issue or ballot question that is reflected by:

An organization's specifically identified objectives in its organizational documents at the time it is established or as such documents are later amended; or

An organization's demonstrated pattern of conduct based upon it:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

During the combined period of the current calendar year and the preceding two calendar years, making either contributions to one or more statewide Colorado issue committees or direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditures, in either support of or opposition to one or more statewide Colorado ballot issues or ballot questions, that exceeded thirty percent of the total dollar amount of all funds spent by the organization for any purpose and in any location during the entire preceding and current calendar years;

During the combined period of the current calendar year and the preceding two calendar years, making either contributions to a single statewide Colorado issue committee or direct ballot issue or ballot question expenditures, in either support of or opposition to a single statewide Colorado ballot issue or ballot question, that exceeded twenty percent of the total dollar amount of all funds spent by the organization for any purpose and in any location; or

Acting as an issue committee's funding intermediary by making contributions to an issue committee from funds earmarked for the issue committee.

The provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (12) are intended to clarify, based on the decision of the Colorado court of appeals in Independence Institute v. Coffman, 209 P.3d 1130 (Colo. App. 2008), cert. denied, 558 U.S. 1024, 130 S. Ct. 165, 175 L. Ed. 479 (2009), section 2 (10)(a)(I) of article XXVIII of the state constitution and not to make a substantive change to said section 2 (10)(a)(I).

(12.5) "Media outlet" means a publication or broadcast medium that transmits news, feature stories, entertainment, or other information to the public through various distribution channels, including, without limitation, newspapers; magazines; radio; and broadcast, cable, or satellite television.

(12.7) "Obligating" means, in connection with a named candidate, agreeing to spend in excess of one thousand dollars for an independent expenditure or to give, pledge, loan, or purchase one or more goods, services, or other things of value that have a fair market value in excess of one thousand dollars as an independent expenditure. "Obligating" shall not require that the total amount in excess of one thousand dollars be finally determined at the time of the agreement to spend moneys for an independent expenditure or to give, pledge, loan, or purchase anything of value.

"Person" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (11) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Political committee" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (12) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

(14.5) "Political organization" means a political organization defined in section 527 (e)(1) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that is engaged in influencing or attempting to influence the selection, nomination, election, or appointment of any individual to any state or local public office in the state and that is exempt, or intends to seek any exemption, from taxation pursuant to section 527 of the internal revenue code. "Political organization" shall not be construed to have the same meaning as "political organization" as defined in section 1-1-104 (24) for purposes of the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of this title.

"Political party" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (13) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

(15.3) "Regular biennial school election" means the election that is described in section 22-31-104 (1), C.R.S.

(15.5) "Regular biennial school electioneering communication" has the same meaning as "electioneering communication" as defined in section 2 (7) of article XXVIII of the state constitution; except that, for purpose of the definition of regular biennial school electioneering communication only, "candidate" as referenced in section 2 (7)(a)(I) of said article means a candidate in a regular biennial school election and the requirements specified in section 2 (7)(a)(II) mean a communication that is broadcast, printed, mailed, delivered, or distributed within sixty days before a regular biennial school election. Except as otherwise specified in this subsection (15.5), the definition of "regular biennial school electioneering communication" is the same as that of "electioneering communication".

(15.7) "School district director" means a person serving as a director on the board of education of any school district within the state, including a school district composed of a city and county.

"Small donor committee" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (14) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

(16.3) (a) "Small-scale issue committee" means an issue committee that has accepted or made contributions or expenditures in an amount that does not exceed five thousand dollars during an applicable election cycle for the major purpose of supporting or opposing any ballot issue or ballot question.

The following are treated as a single small-scale issue committee:

All small-scale issue committees that support or oppose a common ballot measure if the committees are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by a single corporation or its subsidiaries;

All small-scale issue committees that support or oppose a common ballot measure if the committees are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by a single labor organization or the affiliated local units it directs; or

All small-scale issue committees that support or oppose a common ballot measure if the committees are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by substantially the same person, group of persons, or other organizations.

(16.4) "Special school election" means any school election provided for by law and held at a time other than the regular biennial school election.

(16.5) "Spending" means funds expended influencing or attempting to influence the selection, nomination, election, or appointment of any individual to any state or local public office in the state and includes, without limitation, any purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything else of value by any political organization, a contract, promise, or agreement to expend funds made or entered into by any political organization, or any electioneering communication by any political organization.

"Subsidiary" means a business entity having more than half of its stock owned by another entity or person, or a business entity of which a majority interest is controlled by another person or entity.

"Unexpended campaign contributions"shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (15) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 98:

(1) added and (8) amended, p. 223, § 1, effective April 10; (1.5) amended and (14) added, p. 954, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 99:

(5) amended, p. 1390, § 12, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

(1.3), (4)(a)(V), and (4.5) added and (4)(a)(III), (10)(b), and (12) amended, pp. 122, 123, §§ 2, 3, effective March 15; (8) amended, p. 1724, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(8)(a)(I) amended and (8)(a)(III) added, p. 198, § 1, effective April 3; (1.5) and (2) amended, p. 1576, § 1, effective July 1.

Initiated 2002:

Entire section repealed, effective upon proclamation of the Governor (see editor's note, (2)).

L. 2003:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 2156, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2007:

(7) amended, p. 1766, § 1, effective June 1; (6)(c), (14.5), and (16.5) added, pp. 1225, 1224, §§ 2, 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1.3) and (1.5) added, (HB 09-1153), ch. 174, p. 774, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(7) amended and (7.3), (7.5), (10.5), (11.5), (12.5), and (12.7) added, (SB 10-203), ch. 269, p. 1229, § 2, effective May 25; (12) amended, (HB 10-1370), ch. 270, p. 1241, § 4, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2011:

(12)(c) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1148, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2016:

(16.3) added, (SB 16-186), ch. 269, p. 1113, § 1, effective June 10; (15.3) and (15.5) added, (HB 16-1282), ch. 267, p. 1105, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(6)(d) and (6)(e) added and (10) amended, (HB 18-1047), ch. 155, p. 1091, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

IP and (7.5) amended and (16.3) R&RE, (HB 19-1318), ch. 328, p. 3040, § 1, effective August 2; IP and (9) amended, (SB 19-068), ch. 69, p. 250, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(7.2) added and (7.5) and (12)(b)(II) amended (SB 22-237), ch. 400, p. 2851, § 1, effective June 7; (15.7) and (16.4) added, (HB 22-1060), ch. 99, p. 472, § 1, effective July 1.

1-45-103.7. Contribution limits - county offices - school district director - treatment of independent expenditure committees - contributions from limited liability companies - voter instructions on spending limits - definitions.

Nothing in article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article shall be construed to prohibit a corporation or labor organization from making a contribution to a political committee.

(1.5) (a) (I) The maximum amount of aggregate contributions that any one person other than a small donor committee or a political party may make to a candidate committee of a candidate for a county office, and that a candidate committee for such candidate may accept from any such person, is one thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the primary election and one thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the general election.

The maximum amount of aggregate contributions that any one small donor committee may make to a candidate committee of a candidate for a county office, and that a candidate committee for such candidate may accept from any one small donor committee, is twelve thousand five hundred dollars for the primary election and twelve thousand five hundred dollars for the general election.

The maximum amount of aggregate contributions that a political party may make to a candidate committee of a candidate for a county office, and that a candidate committee for such candidate may accept from any political party, is twenty-two thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars for the applicable election cycle.

Candidates may accept contributions subject to the aggregate limits specified in subsection (1.5)(a)(I) or (1.5)(a)(II) of this section in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

Any monetary amount specified in subsection (1.5)(a) of this section must be adjusted in accordance with the adjustments made to other contribution limits as specified in section 3 (13) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

The requirements of sections 1-45-108 and 1-45-109, as applicable, apply to any contribution made or received that is subject to subsection (1.5)(a) of this section.

For purposes of this subsection (1.5), "county office" means a county commissioner, county clerk and recorder, sheriff, coroner, treasurer, assessor, or surveyor.

(1.7) (a) The maximum amount of aggregate contributions that a person, excluding a small donor committee, may make to a candidate committee of a candidate for school district director, and that a candidate committee for such candidate may accept from any one person excluding a small donor committee for a regular biennial school election or special school election, as applicable, is two thousand five hundred dollars.

The maximum amount of aggregate contributions that a small donor committee may make to a candidate committee of a candidate for school district director, and that a candidate committee for such candidate may accept from any one small donor for a regular biennial or special school election, as applicable, is twenty-five thousand dollars.

Any monetary amount specified in subsection (1.7)(a) or (1.7)(b) of this section must be adjusted in accordance with the adjustments made to other contribution limits as specified in section 3 (13) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

The requirements of sections 1-45-108 and 1-45-109, as appropriate, apply to any contribution made or received for any four-year election cycle that is subject to subsection (1.7)(a) or (1.7)(b) of this section.

A political committee may receive and accept moneys contributed to such committee by a corporation or labor organization pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for disbursement to a candidate committee or political party without depositing such moneys in an account separate from the account required to be established for the receipt and acceptance of all contributions by all committees or political parties in accordance with section 3 (9) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

(2.5) (a) An independent expenditure committee differs from a political committee in that an independent expenditure committee does not coordinate its activities with a candidate or political party.

An independent expenditure committee shall not be treated as a political committee and, therefore, is not subject to the requirements of section 3 (5) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

A candidate committee established in the name of a candidate affiliated with either a major political party or a minor political party who is running in a primary election may accept:

The aggregate contribution limit specified in section 3 (1) of article XXVIII of the state constitution for a primary election at any time after the date of the primary election in which the candidate in whose name the candidate committee is accepting contributions is on the primary election ballot; or

The aggregate contribution limit specified in section 3 (1) of article XXVIII of the state constitution for a general election at any time prior to the date of the primary election in which the candidate in whose name the candidate committee is accepting contributions is on the primary election ballot.

A candidate committee established in the name of a candidate affiliated with either a major political party or a minor political party running in a primary election may expend contributions received and accepted for a general election prior to the date of the primary election in which the candidate in whose name the candidate committee is accepting contributions is on the primary election ballot. A candidate committee established in the name of a candidate affiliated with a major political party or a minor political party running in a primary election who wins the primary election may expend contributions received and accepted for a primary election in the general election.

(4.5) (a) A candidate committee established in the name of a candidate who is a write-in candidate, an unaffiliated candidate, or the candidate of a minor political party who is not running in a primary election may accept from any one person the aggregate contribution limit specified in either section 3 (1) of article XXVIII of the state constitution or subsection (1.5)(a) of this section applicable to the office he or she is seeking at any point during the election cycle in which the candidate in whose name the candidate committee is accepting contributions is on the general election ballot.

A candidate committee established in the name of a candidate who is a write-in candidate, an unaffiliated candidate, or the candidate of a minor political party who is not running in a primary election may expend contributions received and accepted in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (4.5) at any point during the election cycle in which the candidate in whose name the candidate committee is accepting contributions is on the general election ballot.

No limited liability company shall make any contribution to a candidate committee or political party if one or more of the individual members of the limited liability company is:

A corporation;

A labor organization;

A natural person who is not a citizen of the United States;

A foreign government;

A professional lobbyist, volunteer lobbyist, or the principal of a professional or volunteer lobbyist, and the contribution is prohibited under section 1-45-105.5 (1); or

Otherwise prohibited by law from making the contribution.

No limited liability company shall make any contribution to a political committee if one or more of the individual members of the limited liability company is:

An entity formed under and subject to the laws of a foreign country;

A natural person who is not a citizen of the United States; or

A foreign government.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (5), no limited liability company shall make any contribution to a candidate committee or political party if either the limited liability company has elected to be treated as a corporation by the internal revenue service pursuant to 26 CFR 301.7701-3 or any successor provision or the shares of the limited liability company are publicly traded. A contribution by a limited liability company with a single natural person member that does not elect to be treated as a corporation by the internal revenue service pursuant to 26 CFR 301.7701-3 shall be attributed only to the single natural person member.

Any limited liability company that is authorized to make a contribution shall, in writing, affirm to the candidate committee, political committee, or political party to which it has made a contribution, as applicable, that it is authorized to make a contribution, which affirmation shall also state the names and addresses of all of the individual members of the limited liability company. No candidate committee, political committee, or political party shall accept a contribution from a limited liability company unless the written affirmation satisfying the requirements of this paragraph (d) is provided before the contribution is deposited by the candidate committee, political committee, or political party. The candidate committee, political committee, or political party receiving the contribution shall retain the written affirmation for not less than one year following the date of the end of the election cycle during which the contribution is received.

Any contribution by a limited liability company, and the aggregate amount of contributions from multiple limited liability companies attributed to a single member of any such company under this subparagraph (II), shall be subject to the limits governing such contributions under section 3 of article XXVIII of the state constitution. A limited liability company that makes any contribution to a candidate committee, political committee, or political party shall, at the time it makes the contribution, provide information to the recipient committee or political party as to the amount of the total contribution attributed to each member of the limited liability company. The attribution shall reflect the capital each member of the limited liability company has invested in the company relative to the total amount of capital invested in the company as of the date the company makes the campaign contribution, and for a single member limited liability company, the contribution shall be attributed to that single member. The limited liability company shall then deduct the amount of the contribution attributed to each of its members from the aggregate contribution limit applicable to multiple limited liability companies under this subparagraph (II) for purposes of ensuring that the aggregate amount of contributions from multiple limited liability companies attributed to a single member does not exceed the contribution limits in section 3 of article XXVIII of the state constitution. Nothing in this subparagraph (II) shall be construed to restrict a natural person from making a contribution in his or her own name to any committee or political party to the extent authorized by law.

(5.3) An issue committee or small-scale issue committee shall not knowingly accept contributions from:

Any natural person who is not a citizen of the United States;

A foreign government; or

Any foreign corporation that does not have the authority to transact business in this state pursuant to article 115 of title 7 or any successor section.

(5.5) A natural person who is not a citizen of the United States, a foreign government, or a foreign corporation shall not establish, register, or maintain a political committee, small donor committee, political party, issue committee, or small-scale issue committee, or make an electioneering communication or regular biennial school electioneering communication.

No nondomestic corporation may make any contribution under article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article that a domestic corporation is prohibited from making under article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article.

(6.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a candidate committee established in the name of a candidate may expend contributions received and accepted by the committee during any particular election cycle to reimburse the candidate for reasonable and necessary expenses for the care of children or other dependents the candidate incurs directly in connection with the candidate's campaign activities during the election cycle. The candidate committee shall disclose the expenditures in the same manner as any other expenditures the committee is required to disclose under section 1-45-108 (1)(a)(I).

Any person who believes that a violation of subsection (1.5), (1.7), (5), or (6) of this section has occurred may file a written complaint with the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-45-111.7 (2).

Any person who has violated subsection (1.5), (1.7), (5)(a), (5)(b), (5)(c), or (6) of this section is subject to a civil penalty of at least double and up to five times the amount contributed or received in violation of the applicable provision.

Any person who has violated any of the provisions of subsection (5)(d)(I) of this section is subject to a civil penalty of fifty dollars per day for each day that the written affirmation regarding the membership of a limited liability company has not been filed with or retained by the candidate committee, political committee, or political party to which a contribution has been made.

As used in this section, "limited liability company" has the same meaning as "domestic limited liability company" as defined in section 7-90-102 (15) or "foreign limited liability company" as defined in section 7-90-102 (24).

The voters instruct the Colorado congressional delegation to propose and support, and the Colorado state legislature to ratify, an amendment to the United States Constitution that allows Congress and the states to limit campaign contributions and spending, to ensure that all citizens, regardless of wealth, can express their views to one another and their government on a level playing field.

The provisions of this subsection shall take effect on January 1, 2013, and be applicable thereafter.

For purposes of this section, the terms "unaffiliated", "major political party", and "minor political party" have the same meanings as specified in the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of this title.

If, within the six months before becoming a candidate for public office, a person actively solicits funds for an independent expenditure committee with the intent of benefiting his or her future candidacy, any expenditure made by that independent expenditure committee in that candidate's race is presumed to be controlled by or coordinated with that candidate and deemed to constitute both a contribution by the maker of the expenditures, and an expenditure by the candidate committee.

If any complaint filed under section 1-45-111.7 for a violation of this subsection (11) fails to state sufficient facts to support the allegations of the complaint, upon a final agency action, the respondent to such a complaint may apply to the state district court for an award of the person's attorneys fees and costs in connection with defending against the complaint if the district court determines that the complaint was frivolous, vexatious, or for the purpose of harassment.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2160, § 6, effective June 3.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 863, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2007:

(5), (6), (7), and (8) added, p. 1766, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(5)(d)(II) amended, p. 440, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2010:

(2.5) added and (6) and (8) amended, (SB 10-203), ch. 269, p. 1230, § 3, effective May 25.

Initiated 2012, (Amendment 65):

(9) added, L. 2013, p. 3301, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 1, 2013.

L. 2014:

IP(3) and (4) amended and (4.5) and (10) added, (HB 14-1335), ch. 145, p. 494, § 2, effective May 2.

L. 2018:

(2.5) and (8) amended, (HB 18-1047), ch. 155, p. 1092, § 2, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

(7)(a) amended, (SB 19-232), ch. 330, p. 3065, § 2, effective July 1; (1.5) added and (4.5)(a) and (7)(b) amended, (HB 19-1007), ch. 97, p. 356, § 1, effective August 2; (5.3), (5.5), and (11) added, (HB 19-1318), ch. 328, p. 3041, § 2, effective August 2; (6.5) added, (SB 19-229), ch. 354, p. 3260, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2022:

(1.7) added and (7) amended, (HB 22-22-1060), ch. 99, p. 472, § 2, effective July 1.

1-45-104. Contribution limits. (Repealed)

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 98:

(13)(a)(II) amended, p. 632, § 2, effective May 6; (13)(c) amended, p. 950, § 1, effective May 27; (14) added, p. 955, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 99:

IP(2) amended, p. 1391, § 13, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 129, § 12, effective March 15.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 1-45-111 as it existed prior to 1996.

1-45-105. Voluntary campaign spending limits. (Repealed)

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 951, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 129, § 12, effective March 15.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 1-45-112 as it existed prior to 1996.

1-45-105.3. Contribution limits. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added with relocations, p. 118, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 2002:

(4)(a.5) added, p. 1929, § 1, effective June 7.

Initiated 2002:

Entire section repealed, effective upon proclamation of the Governor (see editor's note, (2)).

1-45-105.5. Contributions to members of general assembly and governor during consideration of legislation.

No professional lobbyist, volunteer lobbyist, or principal of a professional lobbyist or volunteer lobbyist shall make or promise to make a contribution to, or solicit or promise to solicit a contribution for:

A member of the general assembly or candidate for the general assembly, when the general assembly is in regular session;

The governor or a candidate for governor when the general assembly is in regular session or when any measure adopted by the general assembly in a regular session is pending before the governor for approval or disapproval; or

The lieutenant governor, the secretary of state, the state treasurer, the attorney general, or a candidate for any of such offices when the general assembly is in regular session.

As used in this subsection (1):

"Principal" means any person that employs, retains, engages, or uses, with or without compensation, a professional or volunteer lobbyist. One does not become a principal, nor may one be considered a principal, merely by belonging to an organization or owning stock in a corporation that employs a lobbyist.

The terms "professional lobbyist" and "volunteer lobbyist" shall have the meanings ascribed to them in section 24-6-301, C.R.S.

Nothing contained in this subsection (1) shall be construed to prohibit lobbyists and their principals from raising money when the general assembly is in regular session or when regular session legislation is pending before the governor, except as specifically prohibited in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

Nothing contained in this subsection (1) shall be construed to prohibit a lobbyist or principal of a lobbyist from participating in a fund-raising event of a political party when the general assembly is in regular session or when regular session legislation is pending before the governor, so long as the purpose of the event is not to raise money for specifically designated members of the general assembly, specifically designated candidates for the general assembly, the governor, or specifically designated candidates for governor.

A payment by a lobbyist or a principal of a lobbyist to a political party to participate in such a fund-raising event shall be reported as a contribution to the political party pursuant to section 1-45-108; except that, if the lobbyist or principal of a lobbyist receives a meal in return for a portion of the payment, only the amount of the payment in excess of the value of the meal shall be considered a contribution to the political party. The political party shall determine the value of the meal received for such payment, which shall approximate the actual value of the meal.

A gift of a meal described in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c) by a lobbyist or a principal of a lobbyist to a candidate elected to any office described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) but who has not yet been sworn into such office shall be reported as follows:

The lobbyist shall report the value of the meal in the lobbyist disclosure statement filed pursuant to section 24-6-302, C.R.S.

The elected candidate who has not yet been sworn into office shall report the value of the meal in the public official disclosure statement filed pursuant to section 24-6-203, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added with relocations, p. 118, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 2012:

IP(1)(c)(IV) and (1)(c)(IV)(B) amended, (HB 12-1070), ch. 167, p. 586, § 5, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-45-104 (13) as it existed prior to 2000.